Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-227
Restriction on advance payment.

It is unlawful for a seller to request or receive payment or other consideration, in advance, from a consumer to recover or otherwise aid in the return of money or any other item lost by the consumer in a prior telemarketing transaction. This section does not apply to services provided to a consumer by an attorney licensed to practice law.

Laws 1999, LB 469, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-2006;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 89.